Florida, session 2026, SB582.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âPresent paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of 26 section 624.315, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 27 (d), and a new paragraph (c) is added to that subsection, to 28 read: 29 624.315âAnnual reports; quarterly reports.â 30 (4) 31 (c)1.âThe Legislature finds that the state has a strong and 32 legitimate financial interest in the health and performance of 33 the property and casualty insurance market. Further, the costs 34 of property insurance may have a strong impact on the 35 performance of Floridaâs housing market, to the benefit or 36 detriment of Florida residents. Therefore, it is in the interest 37 of Floridians that the office collect and analyze data regarding 38 market conduct and performance. 39 2.âThe office shall create a report that, for each insurer, 40 licensee, or registrant, provides a list of related entities, 41 including, but not limited to, subsidiaries, management 42 companies, captive vendors, and reinsurers which share common 43 executive officers, directors, or offices or at least 10 percent 44 common ownership with the insurer, licensee, or registrant. The 45 report must also detail the financial relationship between the 46 entities. The office shall publish the report on its website and 47 submit it to the commission, the President of the Senate, the 48 Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the legislative 49 committees with jurisdiction over matters of insurance on or 50 before January 31 of each year. 51 3.âThe office shall create a report detailing the 52 compensation of executive officers for each insurer, licensee, 53 or registrant, including, but not limited to, salaries, 54 benefits, stock options, bonuses, stock buybacks, and other 55 taxable payments, expressed both as dollar amounts and as a 56 percentage of the entityâs total revenue. The report must 57 include the profits and losses of each entity as reported in its 58 financial statements and highlight any compensation exceeding 59 the industry average. The office shall also include in the 60 report any rationale provided by the insurer justifying 61 compensation exceeding the industry average. The office shall 62 publish the report on its website and submit it to the 63 commission, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the 64 House of Representatives, and the legislative committees with 65 jurisdiction over matters of insurance on or before January 31 66 of each year. 67 4.âTo create the reports required under subparagraphs 2. 68 and 3., the office shall use a reliable and up-to-date 69 methodology and software and shall routinely review such 70 methodology and software for accuracy. 71 5.âAny data provided by insurers to the office under this 72 paragraph are not considered trade secrets under s. 812.081, and 73 the office may use such data for market analysis, financial 74 assessments, rate-setting, and compliance reviews. Insurers may 75 not withhold any financial or other data requested by the office 76 under this paragraph as being business sensitive or trade 77 secrets. 78 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 79 627.062, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 80 627.062âRate standards.â 81 (2)âAs to all such classes of insurance: 82 (b)âUpon receiving a rate filing, the office shall review 83 the filing to determine whether if a rate is excessive, 84 inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory. In making that 85 determination, the office shall, in accordance with generally 86 accepted and reasonable actuarial techniques, consider the 87 following factors: 88 1.âPast and prospective loss experience within and without 89 this state. 90 2.âPast and prospective expenses. 91 3.âThe degree of competition among insurers for the risk 92 insured. 93 4.âInvestment income reasonably expected by the insurer, 94 consistent with the insurerâs investment practices, from 95 investable premiums anticipated in the filing, plus any other 96 expected income from currently invested assets representing the 97 amount expected on unearned premium reserves and loss reserves. 98 The commission may adopt rules using reasonable techniques of 99 actuarial science and economics to specify the manner in which 100 insurers calculate investment income attributable to classes of 101 insurance written in this state and the manner in which 102 investment income is used to calculate insurance rates. Such 103 manner must contemplate allowances for an underwriting profit 104 factor and full consideration of investment income that produces 105 a reasonable rate of return; however, investment income from 106 invested surplus may not be considered. 107 5.âThe reasonableness of the judgment reflected in the 108 filing. 109 6.âDividends, savings, or unabsorbed premium deposits 110 allowed or returned to policyholders, members, or subscribers in 111 this state. 112 7.âThe adequacy of loss reserves. 113 8.âThe cost of reinsurance. The office may not disapprove a 114 rate as excessive solely due to the insurer having obtained 115 catastrophic reinsurance to cover the insurerâs estimated 250 116 year probable maximum loss or any lower level of loss. 117 9.âTrend factors, including trends in actual losses per 118 insured unit for the insurer making the filing. 119 10.âConflagration and catastrophe hazards, if applicable. 120 11.âProjected hurricane losses, if applicable, which must 121 be estimated using a model or method found to be acceptable or 122 reliable by the Florida Commission on Hurricane Loss Projection 123 Methodology, and as further provided in s. 627.0628. 124 12.âProjected flood losses for personal residential 125 property insurance, if applicable, which may be estimated using 126 a model or method, or a straight average of model results or 127 output ranges, independently found to be acceptable or reliable 128 by the Florida Commission on Hurricane Loss Projection 129 Methodology and as further provided in s. 627.0628. 130 13.âA reasonable margin for underwriting profit and 131 contingencies. 132 14.âThe cost of medical services, if applicable. 133 15.âAny report created by the office pursuant to s. 134 624.315(4)(c)3. 135 16.âOther relevant factors that affect the frequency or 136 severity of claims or expenses. 137 138 The provisions of this subsection do not apply to workersâ 139 compensation, employerâs liability insurance, and motor vehicle 140 insurance. 141 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.